test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-imitaawa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - imitááwa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     imitááwa+NA+Sg: imitááwa
     imitááwa+NA+Pl: imitááíksi
     imitááwa+NA+Obv: imitááyi
     imitááwa+NA+Non: imitááí
     
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitomitááma
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitomitáámiksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitomitáámi
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitomitáámi
     
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitomitááminnaana
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitomitááminnaaniksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitomitááminnaani
     imitááwa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitomitááminnaani

     imitááwa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitomitááminnoona
     imitááwa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitomitááminnooniksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitomitááminnooni
     imitááwa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitomitááminnooni

     imitááwa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitomitááma
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitomitáámiksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitomitáámi
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitomitáámi

     imitááwa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitomitáámoaawa
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitomitáámoaawaiksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitomitáámoaawayi
     imitááwa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitomitáámoaawai

     imitááwa+NA+Px3Sg+Sg: otomitááma
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otomitáámiksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otomitáámi
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otomitáámi

     imitááwa+NA+Px3Pl+Sg: otomitáámoaawa
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otomitáámoaawaiksi
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otomitáámoaawayi
     imitááwa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otomitáámoaawai
